Louisiana, session 2026, HB558.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1.(A) This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Teacher Pay
Modernization Act".
(B) The legislature recognizes, as provided in the Preamble of Article VIII of the
Constitution of Louisiana, that the goal of the public educational system is to provide
learning environments and experiences, at all stages of human development, that are
humane, just, and designed to promote excellence in order that every individual may be
afforded an equal opportunity to develop to his full potential. The legislature finds that
classroom teachers play a significant role in helping each student develop to his full
potential. It is the intent of the legislature that governmental efficiency efforts are
maximized at all levels of state government to realize savings that can be appropriated by
the legislature for the purposes of adjusting teacher salaries.
Section 2. R.S. 17:418.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-868 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 558
§418.2. Teacher salaries; reporting
A. The state Department of Education shall submit a written report not later
than October 1, 2026, to the House Committee on Education, the Senate Committee
on Education, the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on
Finance, and each school governing authority that includes the following relative to
teacher salaries:
(1) Each district's most recent average annual teacher salary as determined
by the state Department of Education.
(2) Louisiana's most recent average teacher salary as determined by the state
Department of Education.
(3) The most recent average annual teacher salary reported by the Southern
Regional Education Board.
(4) An analysis of the funding of teacher salary schedules and
recommendations for how to maximize competitiveness and efficiency by
modernizing employee and retirement benefits in order that both the state and school
governing authorities may realize savings that could be invested in teacher salary
increases.
B. For purposes of this Section:
(1) "District" means the school or group of schools under the jurisdiction of
a school governing authority.
(2) "School governing authority" means each city, parish, and other local
public school board, the governing authority of each state special school, and the
governing authority of each charter school.
C. Each department as defined in R.S. 36:3(3) shall submit a written report
by November fifteenth annually to the House Committee on Appropriations and the
Senate Committee on Finance that identifies the potential consolidation of functions,
offices, and divisions, elimination of job positions, and other efforts toward
efficiency and economy of services that could generate savings to be appropriated
by the legislature for the purposes of adjusting teacher salaries as provided in R.S.
17:418.3.
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-868 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 558
Section 3. R.S. 17:418.3 and 3996(B)(24) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§418.3. Teacher salaries; salary schedule adjustments; reporting; rules
A. For purposes of this Section:
(1) "District" means the school or group of schools under the jurisdiction of
a school governing authority.
(2) "District average" means a district's most recent average annual teacher
salary as determined by the state Department of Education.
(3) "School governing authority" means each city, parish, and other local
public school board, the governing authority of each state special school, and the
governing authority of each charter school.
(4) "Southern regional average" means the most recent average annual
teacher salary reported by the Southern Regional Education Board or its successor
organization.
(5) "Statewide average" means Louisiana's most recent average teacher
salary as determined by the state Department of Education.
(6) "Teacher" means a certificated classroom teacher.
B.(1) For Fiscal Year 2027-2028, each school governing authority shall
adjust its salary schedule as necessary to reduce by at least twenty-five percent the
difference between its district average and the Southern regional average.
(2) For Fiscal Year 2028-2029, each school governing authority shall adjust
its salary schedule as necessary to reduce by at least fifty percent the remaining
difference between its district average and the Southern regional average.
(3) For Fiscal Year 2029-2030, each school governing authority shall adjust
its salary schedule as necessary to reduce by at least seventy-five percent the
remaining difference between its district average and the Southern regional average.
(4) For Fiscal Year 2030-2031 and each fiscal year thereafter, each school
governing authority shall adjust its salary schedule as necessary for the district's
average annual teacher salary for the applicable year to equal or exceed the Southern
regional average.
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-868 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 558
C. The state Department of Education shall submit a written report not later
than October first annually to the House Committee on Education, the Senate
Committee on Education, the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate
Committee on Finance, and each school governing authority that includes the
following relative to teacher salaries:
(1) Each district average.
(2) The statewide average.
(3) The Southern regional average.
(4) The amount of any state funding appropriated and distributed to school
governing authorities for the purposes of this Section.
(5) School governing authority compliance with the provisions of this
Section.
(6) The remaining difference between the statewide average and the
Southern regional average, if any.
D. No school governing authority shall use funds appropriated by the
legislature for the purposes of this Section for any purposes other than permanent,
direct increases to base teacher salary schedules. Funds shall not be used for benefits
or retirement costs, bonuses or one-time stipends, administrative salaries,
professional services, or operating expenses. The use of funds as provided in this
Subsection shall be subject to compliance audits.
E. The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall adopt rules
for the implementation of the provisions of this Section and R.S. 17:3996(B)(24)
relative to the application of these provisions to charter schools.
* * *
§3996. Charter schools; exemptions; requirements
* * *
B. Notwithstanding any state law, rule, or regulation to the contrary and
except as may be otherwise specifically provided for in an approved charter, a
charter school established and operated in accordance with the provisions of this
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-868 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 558
Chapter and its approved charter and the school's officers and employees shall be
exempt from all statutory mandates or other statutory requirements that are
applicable to public schools and to public school officers and employees except for
the following laws otherwise applicable to public schools with the same grades:
* * *
(24) Teacher salary schedule adjustments, R.S. 17:418.3.
* * *
Section 4. The provisions of Section 3 of this Act shall become effective on July 1,
2027, if the legislature enacts a specific appropriation of monies for the implementation of
the provisions of Section 3 of this Act during the 2027 Regular Session of the Legislature
and such appropriation becomes effective.
Section 5. The provisions of this Section, Section 1, Section 2, and Section 4 of this
Act shall become effective upon signature of this Act by the governor or, if not signed by
the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature by the
governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If this Act
is vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, the provisions of
this Section, Section 1, Section 2, and Section 4 of this Act shall become effective on the day
following such approval.